District of Columbia statutes.
2-308.13

Transferred

Definitions.

Recodified as § 2-381.01.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 813, 32 DCR 7396
as added May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-104, § 2(g)
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 10(a), 46 DCR 2118